Washington statutes.
RCW 33.20.125

Record of member deposits—As in lieu of passbook, statement, or certificate of deposit.

An association shall maintain a record of all deposits received from its members. The issuance of a passbook, statement, or certificate may be omitted for any account if a record thereof is maintained in lieu of a passbook, statement, or certificate of deposit, on which shall be entered deposits, withdrawals, and interest credited.

[ 1982 c 3 s 40.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.